Utah statutes.
9-4-925.   Low-income housing tax credits.

(1)  The corporation is designated the "Housing Credit Agency" for the state within the meaning of 26 U.S.C. Sec. 42(h) and for the purposes of carrying out 26 U.S.C. Sec. 42 and any regulations promulgated under that section.

(2)  The entire state housing credit ceiling for each calendar year is allocated to the corporation.

(3)  The allocation of the state housing credit ceiling shall be made under the state's qualified allocation plan within the meaning of 26 U.S.C. Sec. 42(m), as amended, and as provided in Subsection (4).

(4)  The corporation may amend the state's qualified allocation plan as necessary to comply with revisions to the low-income housing tax credit program under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 42, or as may be necessary to further the goals and purposes of the low-income housing tax credit program for the state.

(5)  The corporation, or a subsidiary of the corporation, may have a direct or indirect ownership interest in, and may materially participate in the operation and management of, a housing development or program that has received an allocation of the state housing credit ceiling.

